New Jersey, session 222, A4443.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A residential mortgage lender that makes loans upon the security of real property containing one to four family units in this State and holds hazard insurance proceeds in a loss draft account pending property rebuilding or repair shall pay interest on the proceeds at a rate of at least two percent interest per year.  The interest shall be credited to the loss draft account annually or upon termination of the account, whichever is earlier. b.    A residential mortgage lender shall not impose a fee or charge in connection with the maintenance or disbursement of hazard insurance proceeds held in a loss draft account if the fee or charge will result in an interest rate of less than two percent per year on the hazard insurance proceeds being held. c.     This section shall not apply to hazard insurance proceeds held in a loss draft account that are required by a State or federal regulatory authority to be placed into a non-interest-bearing demand trust fund account by a residential mortgage lender that is not a financial institution. d.    Notwithstanding any other law, rule, or regulation, a residential mortgage lender may deposit hazard insurance proceeds in an interest-bearing account in a federally insured depository institution, a federal home loan bank, a federal reserve bank, or another similar financial institution. e.     For funds held in a loss draft account, the interest described pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall begin to accrue on the effective date of this act. f.     The provisions of this section are severable.  If any provision of this section is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions that can be given effect without the invalid provision. g.    As used in this section: Financial institution means a bank, savings institution, or credit union chartered under the laws of this State or the United States. Hazard insurance proceeds means payments made by an  insurance company, authorized to write homeowners insurance policies in this State, to a borrower, after an event covered by the insurance company causes damage to the borrowers property. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.